sk-SK: Typ nánosníka: Anatomický; Anglický; Konvertibilný; Švédsky; Znížený; Mexický; Kombinovaný; Hannoverský; Micklem; Bez nánosníka; Široký; Iné
da: Type af næsebånd: Anatomisk; Kapsun; Konvertibelt; Med tilbagetræk; Drop; Krydsnæsebånd; Kombineret; Hannoveransk; Micklem; Uden næsebånd; Bredt; Andet
es: Tipo de muserola: Anatómico; Cabezón; Convertible; Sueco; Caído; Figura de ocho (mexicana); Flash; Hannoveriano; Micklem; Sin muserola; Ancho; Otro
sv: Typ av nosgrimma: Anatomisk; Engelsk nosgrimma; Konvertibel; Tillbakaknäppt nosgrimma; Remontnosgrimma; Pullarnosgrimma; Aachennosgrimma; Hannoveransk; Micklem; Utan nosgrimma; Bred; Övrigt
nl: Neusriem type: Anatomisch; Engelse neusriem; Aanpasbaar; Aansnoerneusriem; Lage neusriem; Mexicaanse neusriem (kruisneusriem); Gecombineerde neusriem; Hannoveraanse neusriem; Micklem; Zonder neusriem; Breed; Overig
zh-CN: 鼻带类型: 解剖型; 卡维森型 (Cavesson); 可转换型; 缩紧型 (Crank); 下垂型; [8 字型 (Grackle)]; 连闪型 (Flash); 汉诺威型 (Hanoverian); 米克莱姆型 (Micklem); 无鼻革型; 宽型; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta nosnika (nosnega jermena): Anatomsko; Kaveson; Prilagodljivo; Z zategovanjem; Spuščeno; Osmica (grackle); Flash; Hanoveransko; Micklem; Brez nosnika; Široko; Drugo
cs: Typ nánosníku: Anatomický; Anglický; Variabilní; Švédský; Hannoverský; Mexický; S podpínkou; Kombinovaný; Micklem; Bez nánosníku; Široký; Ostatní
hu: Orrszíj típusa: Anatómiai; Angol orrszíj; Átalakítható; Svéd orrszíj; Csikóorrszíj; Mexikói; Kombinált; Hannoveri; Micklem; Orrszíj nélküli; Széles; Egyéb
it: Tipo di capezzina: Anatomico; Cavesson; Convertibile; Crank; Drop; A otto (messicana); Flash; Hannover; Micklem; Senza capezzina; Largo; Altro
ko: 코밴드형: 해부학적; 케이브슨; 컨버터블; 크랭크; 드롭; 8자형(그래클); 플래시; 하노베리안; 미클렘; 코끈 없음; 와이드; 기타
tr: Burun bandı tipi: Anatomik; Cavesson; Dönüştürülebilir; Krank; Drop; Sekiz (grackle); Flash; Hannover; Micklem; Burunluksuz; Geniş; Diğer
vi: Loại dây đeo mũi: Công thái học; Cavesson; Có thể chuyển đổi; Crank; Drop; Hình số 8 (grackle); Flash; Hanoverian; Micklem; Không có dải mũi; Rộng; Khác
ru: Тип капсюля: Анатомический; Кавессон; Сменный; Шведский; Спускающийся; Мексиканский (восьмерка); Ирландский; Ганноверский; Миклем; Без капсюля; Широкий; Другое
de: Typ des Nasenbands: Anatomisch; Kappzaum; Umwandelbar; Schwedisch; Drop; Mexikanisch; Kombiniert; Hannoveranisch; Micklem; Ohne Reithalfter; Breit; Andere
fr: Type de muserolle: Anatomique; Caveçon; Convertible; Suédoise; Allemande; Croisée (grackle); Combinée; Hanovrienne; Micklem; Sans muserolle; Large; Autre
ja: ノーズバンドタイプ: アナトミカル; カベソン; コンバーチブル; クランク; ドロップ; 8の字 (グラックル); フラッシュ; ハノーバー; ミクレム; ノーズバンドなし; ワイド; その他
pt-BR: Focinheira tipo: Anatômica; Cavesson; Conversível; Crank; Drop; Oito (grackle); Flash; Hanoveriana; Micklem; Sem focinheira; Larga; Outro
bg-BG: Тип ремък за нос: Анатомичен; Обикновен (Cavesson); Комбиниран; Crank (шведски); Нисък; Осморка (grackle); Flash (ирландски); Хановерски; Micklem; Без капсул; Широк; Друго
th: แบบสายรัดจมูก: ออกแบบตามสรีระ; คาเวสซัน (Cavesson); ปรับเปลี่ยนได้; แคร็งก์; แบบดรอป; รูปเลขแปด (แกร็คเกิล); แฟลช; ฮันโนเวอร์เรียน; มิคเคลม; ไม่มีสายรัดจมูก; แบบกว้าง; อื่นๆ
nb: Type nesereim: Anatomisk; Kapsun; Konverterbar; Tilbaketrekk; Lav; Kryssnesereim; Aachen; Hannoveransk; Micklem; Uten nesereim; Bred; Annet
zh-TW: 鼻革類型: 解剖型; Cavesson; 可轉換型; Crank; Drop; 8 字型 (Grackle); Flash; 漢諾威型; Micklem; 無鼻革; 寬型; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta nosnog remena: Anatomski; Engleski; Konvertibilni; Švedski; Spušteni; Meksički; Irski; Hanoverski; Micklem; Bez remena za nos; Široki; Ostalo
ro-RO: Tipul de bandă nazală: Anatomic; Cavesson; Convertibil; Crank; Tip drop; Cifra opt (grackle); Flash; Hanoverian; Micklem; Fără botar; Lat; Altele
fi: Turpahihnan tyyppi: Anatominen; Englantilainen; Muunnettava; Pullaturpahihna; Remonttiturpahihna; Meksikolainen; Aachen-turpahihna; Hannoverilainen; Micklem; Ilman turpahihnaa; Leveä; Muu
lt-LT: Nosies dirželio tipas: Anatominis; Kavesonas; Konvertuojamas; Suveržiamas; Nuleistas; Aštuoniukė (Meksikietiškas kapsulas); „Flash“; Hanoverio; „Micklem“; Be nosies diržo; Platus; Kita
pl: Typ nachrapnika: Anatomiczny; Angielski; Wymienny; Zaciskowy; Opadający; Meksykański (krzyżowy); Kombinowany (flash); Hanowerski; Micklem; Bez nachrapnika; Szeroki; Inne
el: Τύπος ιμάντα ρύγχους: Ανατομικό; Καβεσόν; Μετατρεπόμενο; Crank; Χαμηλό; Οκτάρι (grackle); Flash; Αννοβεριανό; Micklem; Χωρίς επιρρίνιο; Πλατύ; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de açaime: Anatómico; Cavesson; Convertível; Crank; Caída; Em oito (mexicana); Flash; Hanoveriano; Micklem; Sem focinheira; Largo; Outro
en: Noseband type: Anatomical; Cavesson; Convertible; Crank; Drop; Figure-eight (grackle); Flash; Hanoverian; Micklem; Nosebandless; Wide; Other